software/EmEditor/Dictionaries/en_us_ru_ru.aff
SFX 46 Y 435
SFX 46   чь   жешь         чь
SFX 46   чь   жете         чь
SFX 46   чь   жет          чь
SFX 46   чь   жем          чь
SFX 46   чь   гут          чь
SFX 46   чь   гу           чь
SFX 46   заться жутся        заться
SFX 46   заться жусь         заться
SFX 46   заться жешься       заться
SFX 46   заться жется        заться
SFX 46   заться жетесь       заться
SFX 46   заться жемся        заться
SFX 46   зать жут          зать
SFX 46   зать жу           зать
SFX 46   зать жешь         зать
SFX 46   зать жете         зать
SFX 46   зать жет          зать
SFX 46   зать жем          зать
SFX 46   ыться удутся       быться
SFX 46   ыться удусь        быться
SFX 46   ыться удешься      быться
SFX 46   ыться удется       быться
SFX 46   ыться удетесь      быться
SFX 46   ыться удемся       быться
SFX 46   ыть  удут         быть
SFX 46   ыть  уду          быть
SFX 46   ыть  удешь        быть
SFX 46   ыть  удете        быть
SFX 46   ыть  удет         быть
SFX 46   ыть  удем         быть
SFX 46   ваться овутся       зваться
SFX 46   ваться овусь        зваться
SFX 46   ваться овешься      зваться
SFX 46   ваться овется       зваться
SFX 46   ваться оветесь      зваться
SFX 46   ваться овемся       зваться
SFX 46   ваться овёшься      зваться
SFX 46   ваться овётся       зваться
SFX 46   ваться овётесь      зваться
SFX 46   ваться овёмся       зваться
SFX 46   вать овут         звать
SFX 46   вать ову          звать
SFX 46   вать овешь        звать
SFX 46   вать овете        звать
SFX 46   вать овет         звать
SFX 46   вать овем         звать
SFX 46   вать овёшь        звать
SFX 46   вать овёте        звать
SFX 46   вать овёт         звать
SFX 46   вать овём         звать
SFX 46   жаться гутся        жаться
SFX 46   жаться гусь         жаться
SFX 46   жать гут          жать
SFX 46   жать гу           жать
SFX 46   ться шься         даться
SFX 46   ться вутся        лыться
SFX 46   ться вусь         лыться
SFX 46   ться вешься       лыться
SFX 46   ться вется        лыться
SFX 46   ться ветесь       лыться
SFX 46   ться вемся        лыться
SFX 46   ться вёшься       лыться
SFX 46   ться вётся        лыться
SFX 46   ться вётесь       лыться
SFX 46   ться вёмся        лыться
SFX 46   ться стся         даться
SFX 46   ться нутся        статься
SFX 46   ться нусь         статься
SFX 46   ться нешься       статься
SFX 46   ться нется        статься
SFX 46   ться нетесь       статься
SFX 46   ться немся        статься
SFX 46   ться мся          даться
SFX 46   ться дутся        даться
SFX 46   ться дитесь       даться
SFX 46   ться димся        даться
SFX 46   ть   шь           дать
SFX 46   ть   вут          лыть
SFX 46   ть   ву           лыть
SFX 46   ть   вешь         лыть
SFX 46   ть   вете         лыть
SFX 46   ть   вет          лыть
SFX 46   ть   вем          лыть
SFX 46   ть   вёшь         лыть
SFX 46   ть   вёте         лыть
SFX 46   ть   вёт          лыть
SFX 46   ть   вём          лыть
SFX 46   ть   ут           лезть
SFX 46   ть   у            лезть
SFX 46   ть   ст           дать
SFX 46   ть   нут          стать
SFX 46   ть   ну           стать
SFX 46   ть   нешь         стать
SFX 46   ть   нете         стать
SFX 46   ть   нет          стать
SFX 46   ть   нем          стать
SFX 46   ть   м            дать
SFX 46   ть   ешь          лезть
SFX 46   ть   ете          лезть
SFX 46   ть   ет           лезть
SFX 46   ть   ем           лезть
SFX 46   ть   дут          дать
SFX 46   ть   дите         дать
SFX 46   ть   дим          дать
SFX 46   таться чутся        [^с]таться
SFX 46   таться чусь         [^с]таться
SFX 46   таться чешься       [^с]таться
SFX 46   таться чется        [^с]таться
SFX 46   таться четесь       [^с]таться
SFX 46   таться чемся        [^с]таться
SFX 46   тать чут          [^с]тать
SFX 46   тать чу           [^с]тать
SFX 46   тать чешь         [^с]тать
SFX 46   тать чете         [^с]тать
SFX 46   тать чет          [^с]тать
SFX 46   тать чем          [^с]тать
SFX 46   сться дутся        асться
SFX 46   сться дусь         асться
SFX 46   сться дешься       асться
SFX 46   сться дется        асться
SFX 46   сться детесь       асться
SFX 46   сться демся        асться
SFX 46   сться дёшься       асться
SFX 46   сться дётся        асться
SFX 46   сться дётесь       асться
SFX 46   сться дёмся        асться
SFX 46   сть  дут          асть
SFX 46   сть  ду           асть
SFX 46   сть  дешь         асть
SFX 46   сть  дете         асть
SFX 46   сть  дет          асть
SFX 46   сть  дем          асть
SFX 46   сть  дёшь         асть
SFX 46   сть  дёте         асть
SFX 46   сть  дёт          асть
SFX 46   сть  дём          асть
SFX 46   стись тутся        лестись
SFX 46   стись тусь         лестись
SFX 46   стись тешься       лестись
SFX 46   стись тется        лестись
SFX 46   стись тетесь       лестись
SFX 46   стись темся        лестись
SFX 46   стись тёшься       лестись
SFX 46   стись тётся        лестись
SFX 46   стись тётесь       лестись
SFX 46   стись тёмся        лестись
SFX 46   стись дутся        вестись
SFX 46   стись дусь         вестись
SFX 46   стись дешься       вестись
SFX 46   стись дется        вестись
SFX 46   стись детесь       вестись
SFX 46   стись демся        вестись
SFX 46   стись дёшься       вестись
SFX 46   стись дётся        вестись
SFX 46   стись дётесь       вестись
SFX 46   стись дёмся        вестись
SFX 46   сти  тут          лести
SFX 46   сти  ту           лести
SFX 46   сти  тешь         лести
SFX 46   сти  тете         лести
SFX 46   сти  тет          лести
SFX 46   сти  тем          лести
SFX 46   сти  тёшь         лести
SFX 46   сти  тёте         лести
SFX 46   сти  тёт          лести
SFX 46   сти  тём          лести
SFX 46   сти  дут          вести
SFX 46   сти  ду           вести
SFX 46   сти  дешь         вести
SFX 46   сти  дете         вести
SFX 46   сти  дет          вести
SFX 46   сти  дем          вести
SFX 46   сти  дёшь         вести
SFX 46   сти  дёте         вести
SFX 46   сти  дёт          вести
SFX 46   сти  дём          вести
SFX 46   сти  бут          рести
SFX 46   сти  бу           рести
SFX 46   сти  бешь         рести
SFX 46   сти  бете         рести
SFX 46   сти  бет          рести
SFX 46   сти  бем          рести
SFX 46   сти  бёшь         рести
SFX 46   сти  бёте         рести
SFX 46   сти  бёт          рести
SFX 46   сти  бём          рести
SFX 46   слаться шлешься      слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлется       слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлетесь      слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлемся       слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлются       слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлюсь        слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлёшься      слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлётся       слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлётесь      слаться
SFX 46   слаться шлёмся       слаться
SFX 46   слать шлешь        слать
SFX 46   слать шлете        слать
SFX 46   слать шлет         слать
SFX 46   слать шлем         слать
SFX 46   слать шлют         слать
SFX 46   слать шлю          слать
SFX 46   слать шлёшь        слать
SFX 46   слать шлёте        слать
SFX 46   слать шлёт         слать
SFX 46   слать шлём         слать
SFX 46   скаться щутся        скаться
SFX 46   скаться щусь         скаться
SFX 46   скаться щешься       скаться
SFX 46   скаться щется        скаться
SFX 46   скаться щетесь       скаться
SFX 46   скаться щемся        скаться
SFX 46   скать щут          скать
SFX 46   скать щу           скать
SFX 46   скать щешь         скать
SFX 46   скать щете         скать
SFX 46   скать щет          скать
SFX 46   скать щем          скать
SFX 46   сеть шу           сеть
SFX 46   саться шутся        [^о]саться
SFX 46   саться шусь         [^о]саться
SFX 46   саться шешься       [^о]саться
SFX 46   саться шется        [^о]саться
SFX 46   саться шетесь       [^о]саться
SFX 46   саться шемся        [^о]саться
SFX 46   сать шут          [^о]сать
SFX 46   сать шу           [^о]сать
SFX 46   сать шешь         [^о]сать
SFX 46   сать шете         [^о]сать
SFX 46   сать шет          [^о]сать
SFX 46   сать шем          [^о]сать
SFX 46   раться рутся        [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться русь         [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться решься       [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться рется        [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ретесь       [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ремся        [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться рёшься       [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться рётся        [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться рётесь       [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться рёмся        [^бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерутся       [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерусь        [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерешься      [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерется       [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться еретесь      [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться еремся       [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерёшься      [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерётся       [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерётесь      [бд]раться
SFX 46   раться ерёмся       [бд]раться
SFX 46   рать рут          [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ру           [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать решь         [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рете         [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рет          [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рем          [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рёшь         [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рёте         [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рёт          [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать рём          [^бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерут         [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать еру          [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерешь        [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерете        [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерет         [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерем         [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерёшь        [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерёте        [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерёт         [бд]рать
SFX 46   рать ерём         [бд]рать
SFX 46   яться нутся        мяться
SFX 46   яться нусь         мяться
SFX 46   яться нешься       мяться
SFX 46   яться нется        мяться
SFX 46   яться нетесь       мяться
SFX 46   яться немся        мяться
SFX 46   яться нёшься       мяться
SFX 46   яться нётся        мяться
SFX 46   яться нётесь       мяться
SFX 46   яться нёмся        мяться
SFX 46   ять  нут          мять
SFX 46   ять  ну           мять
SFX 46   ять  нешь         мять
SFX 46   ять  нете         мять
SFX 46   ять  нет          мять
SFX 46   ять  нем          мять
SFX 46   ять  нёшь         мять
SFX 46   ять  нёте         мять
SFX 46   ять  нёт          мять
SFX 46   ять  нём          мять
SFX 46   наться онятся       гнаться
SFX 46   наться онишься      гнаться
SFX 46   наться онится       гнаться
SFX 46   наться онитесь      гнаться
SFX 46   наться онимся       гнаться
SFX 46   наться онюсь        гнаться
SFX 46   нать онят         гнать
SFX 46   нать онишь        гнать
SFX 46   нать оните        гнать
SFX 46   нать онит         гнать
SFX 46   нать оним         гнать
SFX 46   нать оню          гнать
SFX 46   каться чутся        [^с]каться
SFX 46   каться чусь         [^с]каться
SFX 46   каться чешься       [^с]каться
SFX 46   каться чется        [^с]каться
SFX 46   каться четесь       [^с]каться
SFX 46   каться чемся        [^с]каться
SFX 46   кать чут          [^с]кать
SFX 46   кать чу           [^с]кать
SFX 46   кать чешь         [^с]кать
SFX 46   кать чете         [^с]кать
SFX 46   кать чет          [^с]кать
SFX 46   кать чем          [^с]кать
SFX 46   ить  ешь          лить
SFX 46   ить  ете          лить
SFX 46   ить  ет           лить
SFX 46   ить  ем           лить
SFX 46   ить  ют           лить
SFX 46   ить  ю            лить
SFX 46   и    ут           расти
SFX 46   и    у            расти
SFX 46   и    ешь          расти
SFX 46   и    ете          расти
SFX 46   и    ет           расти
SFX 46   и    ем           расти
SFX 46   и    ёшь          расти
SFX 46   и    ёте          расти
SFX 46   и    ёт           расти
SFX 46   и    ём           расти
SFX 46   хаться шутся        хаться
SFX 46   хаться шусь         хаться
SFX 46   хаться шешься       хаться
SFX 46   хаться шется        хаться
SFX 46   хаться шетесь       хаться
SFX 46   хаться шемся        хаться
SFX 46   хать шут          хать
SFX 46   хать шу           хать
SFX 46   хать шешь         хать
SFX 46   хать шете         хать
SFX 46   хать шет          хать
SFX 46   хать шем          хать
